New Jersey, session 222, S75.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Within six months after the effective date of this act, the head of every State agency shall complete a review of that agencys operations for the purpose of determining whether there are ways that the agency could reduce costs through increased use of the Internet, including electronic mail, to provide services and conduct public business.  The review shall include an examination of every agency function that involves: providing or receiving information, including the filing or release of reports and forms; communicating with the public or with any individual, business or federal, State or local government agency, as well as with any employee or unit within the State agency; and the acceptance or disbursement of any payment, as well as any other agency activity the head of the agency deems relevant.  Upon completion of the review, the head of the State agency shall require that agency and its employees, when feasible, to implement use of the Internet in every instance when it has been determined that a cost savings may be realized. b.    Nothing in this section shall be deemed to amend, delete or otherwise change any existing statute, rule or regulation that requires or permits notice to individuals by certified or registered mail and the publication of official notices by a State agency in newspapers circulating within this State or within units of local government of this State. As used in this section, State agency means any of the principal departments in the Executive Branch of State government, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by such department; the Legislative Branch, and any office, board, bureau or commission within or created by the Legislative Branch; the Judicial Branch and any office, board, bureau or commission within or created by the Judicial Branch; any independent authority, commission, instrumentality or agency of the State; and any interstate agency to which New Jersey is a party to the extent permitted by law. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.